District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.01

Federal health benefits.

The health insurance benefit provisions of Chapter 89 of Title 5 of the United States Code are applicable to all employees of the District government first employed before October 1, 1987, except those specifically excluded by law or rule and regulation. Procedures established for administering the health benefits program with the District government shall be consistent with law and civil service rules.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2101, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(c), 34 DCR 5079

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-702 and § 31-3101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-622.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-351.1.

Editor's Notes

Feasibility Study for Federal Employees Health Benefits Program: See § 8 of the Health Care Benefits Expansion Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-114).